Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 26
ENRICHMENT OF BREAD AND FLOUR

Sec.

§ 37-2601. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2602. Enrichment of flour. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2603. Enrichment of bread and rolls. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2604. Enforcement of provisions

Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2605. Revision of standards to conform to interstate shipments. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2606. Suspension of enrichment during shortage. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2607. Publication of orders, rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2608. Method of publication. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2609. Inspection and investigation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-2610. Penalty for violation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.